Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.185.020

Equitable identification of low-income students—Not classified as individual entitlement.

District practices for identifying highly capable students must prioritize equitable identification of low-income students. Access to accelerated learning and enhanced instruction through the program for highly capable students does not constitute an individual entitlement for any particular student.

[ 2023 c 265 s 2; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 412; 2009 c 548 s 708; 1990 c 33 s 168; 1984 c 278 s 14. Formerly RCW 28A.16.050.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 265: "(1) The legislature finds that, for highly capable students, access to accelerated learning and enhanced instruction is access to a basic education. The legislature has directed school districts to prioritize equitable identification of low-income students for participation in highly capable programs and services. The research literature strongly supports using universal screening and multiple criteria to equitably identify students for highly capable programs. There are multiple approaches to implementing universal screening and the use of multiple criteria. The legislature intends all school districts to use best practices and does not intend to prescribe a single method.

(2) The legislature further intends to allocate state funding for the highly capable program based on five percent of each school district's student population. The legislature does not intend to limit highly capable services to five percent of the student population. School districts may identify and serve more than five percent of their students for highly capable programs and services." [ 2023 c 265 s 1.]

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 ss 401-413: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 101-110 and 701-710: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Severability—1984 c 278: See note following RCW 28A.185.010.